apertium-bho.bho.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
   <alphabet>ॊऀँंःऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऺऻ़ऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॏॐ॒॑॓॔ॕॖॗक़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣॱॲॳॴॵॶॷॸॹॺॻॼॽॾ</alphabet> 
	
   <sdefs>
     <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>     
  	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
  	<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
  	<sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
  	<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
  	<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
  	<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
  	<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="verb"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="ind"   c="Indefinite" />
    <sdef n="qnt"   c="Quantitative" />
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/> 
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dist"     c="Distant"/>
    <sdef n="tv"		c="" />
    <sdef n="stem"  c="stem"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"		c="auxiliary verb" />
    <sdef n="fut"    c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="iv"     c="intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="prox"     c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="frm"	  c="formal"/>
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/> 
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/> 
    <sdef n="impf"    c=" Imperfective participle"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective participle"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Subjunctive"/>  
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>  
    <sdef n="acc"      c="accusative"/> 
    <sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
    <sdef n="gna"    c="verbal adverb"/>
    <sdef n="fam"          c="Familiar"/>    
    <sdef n="infml"        c="Informal"/>    
    <sdef n="pol"          c="Polite"/> 
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/> 
    <sdef n="ord"  c="ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="ins"        c="instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="loc"        c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"         c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="percent"    c="Percent"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
   	<sdef n="obj"     c="Objective"/>     
 
   </sdefs>
   <pardefs>

   <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([५६७८९]|[१२३४५६७८९][०१२३४५६७८९]+)</re><p><l><b/>वाँ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!--POSTPOSITION-->

    <pardef n="से__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="__gen_endings">
        <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!--CONJUNCTION-->

    <pardef n="आ__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!--DETERMINERS-->

    <pardef n="एह__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>में</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="दुन्नो__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कोई__det">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ओकर__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="कई__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="हमार/ा__det">
	  <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="बहुत/_सारा__det">
          <e><p><l><b/>सारा</l><r><b/>सारा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l><b/>सारा</l><r><b/>सारा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  	  <e><p><l>े<b/>सारे</l><r><b/>सारा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l>े<b/>सारे</l><r><b/>सारा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l><b/>सारा</l><r><b/>सारा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef> 

	<pardef n="तुम_लोग/_का__det">
          <e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><b/>का<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><b/>का<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e><p><l>ो<b/>का</l><r><b/>का<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l>ो<b/>का</l><r><b/>का<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l><b/>का</l><r><b/>का<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="थोड़/_सा__det">
          <e><p><l>ा<b/>सा</l><r><b/>सा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l>ा<b/>सा</l><r><b/>सा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e><p><l>े<b/>से</l><r><b/>सा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l>े<b/>से</l><r><b/>सा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p><l>ा<b/>सा</l><r><b/>सा<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	  

    <e lm="से"><i>से</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="सिवा"><i>सिवा</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="संगे"><i>संगे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="में"><i>में</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पिछले"><i>पिछले</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के नीचे"><i>के<b/>नीचे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पढ़े"><i>पढ़े</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लगे"><i>लगे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="खातिर"><i>खातिर</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i></i><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
    <e lm="वाला"><i>वाला</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ओके"><i>ओके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="जाके"><i>जाके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लेके"><i>लेके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="उठाके"><i>उठाके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="साथे"><i>साथे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="करेके"><i>करेके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पढ़िके"><i>पढ़िके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लगावेके"><i>लगावेके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ले"><i>ले</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लोग"><i>लोग</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="खड़े"><i>खड़े</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पटे"><i>पटे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="डाले"><i>डाले</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिलहीं"><i>पहिलहीं</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="मोड"><i>मोड</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="वाले"><i>वाले</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="कहिके"><i>कहिके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="जाएके"><i>जाएके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="जमिके"><i>जमिके</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="तबे"><i>तबे</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="अतने"><i>अतने</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिए"><i>के<b/>लिए</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ने"><i>ने</i><par n="से__post"/></e>
    <e lm="अउरी"><i>अउरी</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="लेकिन"><i>लेकिन</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्यपि"><i>यद्यपि</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="आ"><i>आ</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="रउँआ"><i>रउँआ</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="बाकिर"><i>बाकिर</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अउर"><i>अउर</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भा"><i>भा</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="राउर"><i>राउर</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="आखिर"><i>आखिर</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="खम्भा"><i>खम्भा</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="आउर"><i>आउर</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="फगुआ"><i>फगुआ</i><par n="आ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="एह"><i>एह</i><par n="एह__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अइसन"><i>अइसन</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जवन"><i>जवन</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जवना"><i>जवना</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कतना"><i>कतना</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछु"><i>कुछु</i><par n="एह__det"/></e>
    <e lm="दुन्नों"><i>दुन्नों</i><par n="दुन्नो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कई"><i>कई</i><par n="कई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अतना"><i>अतना</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कम"><i>कम</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जेकर"><i>जेकर</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जेकरा"><i>जेकरा</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ओकरा"><i>ओकरा</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिका"><i>अधिका</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ओकर"><i>ओकर</i><par n="ओकर__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अपना"><i>अपन</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="हमारा"><i>हमार</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="इसका"><i>इसक</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उनकरा"><i>उनकर</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ओकरा"><i>ओकर</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="आपका"><i>आपक</i><par n="हमार/ा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="बहुत सारा"><i>बहुत</i><par n="बहुत/_सारा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तुम लोग का"><i>तुम<b/>लोग</i><par n="तुम_लोग/_का__det"/></e>
    <e lm="थोड़ सा"><i>थोड़</i><par n="थोड़/_सा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कीया"><i>कीया</i><par n="कोई__det"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
